Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB812.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 12.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Governor, or any department with the approval of the Governor, may employ
and fix the term of employment and the compensation to be paid to an attorney or
attorneys for legal services to be performed for the Governor or for such
department. An attorney hired for the collection of revenue owed to the state by a
resident shall not be hired by personal service contract. The compensation and
expenses of any attorney or attorneys employed under the provisions of this section
shall be paid out of the appropriations made to such department as other salaries,
compensation and expenses are paid, except when the terms of employment provide
that the compensation shall be on a contingent basis, and in such event the attorneys
may be paid the amount specified out of the moneys recovered by them or out of
the general fund. If the Governor approves the employment, the terms of
employment shall be duly entered by executive order upon the executive journal in
the Office of the Secretary of State.
(2) An attorney may be employed pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section to render legal services for one (1) or more departments, boards, program
cabinets, offices or commissions.
(3) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Governor may participate in
litigation to defend or vindicate only those interests particular to the Office of the
Governor. All other litigation matters affecting the Commonwealth shall be under
the purview of the Attorney General.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 5:10 PM Jacketed